District of Columbia statutes.
38-806

National School Lunch Act.

Insofar as the Board shall conduct a school lunch program under the authority of §§ 38-801 to 38-807, it shall be considered a “school” within the meaning of the National School Lunch Act (42 U.S.C. § 1751 et seq.), and all funds to which it may thus become entitled as a participating school under the National School Lunch Act shall be deposited in the General Fund as provided in § 38-804.

Oct. 8, 1951, 65 Stat. 370, ch. 448, title I, § 8
June 14, 1980, D.C. Law 3-70, § 7(k)(4), 27 DCR 1776
1981 Ed., § 31-806.
1973 Ed., § 31-1407.